Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB769.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding sections to read:Section 743. Physical Space for School Library or Information Center.--(a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each public school building shall maintain a physical space for a library or information center that can support the school library collections required under section 811.(b) The State Board of Education shall incorporate the requirement under subsection (a) into prescribed building 1234567891011121314151617181920 standards, with suggestions to public schools on the best use of space for minimum requirements of print and nonprint materials and technology.(c) Each public school building that is built or rebuilt after the revision of the building standards in accordance with subsection (b) shall conform to the revised building standards.(d) A public school board of directors shall determine the type of physical space required to address the suggestions of the State Board of Education regarding the best use of space.(e) The Secretary of Education may deny approval to any school building construction or reconstruction project which fails to meet the building standards prescribed by the State Board of Education.(f) The State Board of Education shall review the physical space requirements for libraries or information centers every ten years and update the building standards as deemed necessary.(g) This section shall not apply to a cyber charter school or other public school that provides all education services online.Section 811. School Library Collections.--(a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each public school shall maintain a library collection that includes a variety of both print and nonprint materials and related equipment of sufficient quality and quantity to support and supplement the educational needs of students, including a minimum quantity of one thousand (1,000) items per grade served.(b) A certified school librarian may direct the development and implementation of a library of a public school.(c) The department shall promulgate regulations as necessary to implement and administer this section.20250HB0769PN0793 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:" Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Items." Books, films, filmstrips, tapes, records, globes, slide sets, periodicals, audio-visual equipment, maps and other materials to supplement the programs of a public school. The term does not include books classified as textbooks, except when used in limited numbers as reference books."Public school." A school operated by a school district, intermediate unit or charter school that provides in-person education. The term does not include a cyber charter school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0769PN0793 - 3 - 1234567891011121314